Maryland, session 2025, HB0873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–8A–03.
(a) In addition to the jurisdiction specified in Subtitle 8 of this title, the court has
exclusive original jurisdiction over:
(1) A child:
(i) Who is at least 13 years old alleged to be delinquent; or
(ii) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, who is at least
10 years old alleged to have committed an act:
1. That, if committed by an adult, would constitute:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0873*

HOUSE BILL 873
A. A crime of violence, as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal
Law Article;
B. A crime involving handguns under § 4–203 or § 4–204 of
the Criminal Law Article;
C. A crime involving firearms under § 5–133, § 5–134, §
5–138, § 5–142, § 5–203, or § 5–703 of the Public Safety Article;
D. Aggravated cruelty to animals under § 10–606 of the
Criminal Law Article; [or]
E. Sexual offense in the third degree under § 3–307 of the
Criminal Law Article; or
F. THEFT OF A MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER § 7–105 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE, IF THE CHILD HAS PREVIOUSLY BEEN REFERRED TO AN
AT–RISK YOUTH PREVENTION AND DIVERSION PROGRAM, AS DEFINED IN § 8–601 OF
THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE, FOR A VIOLATION OF § 4–203, § 4–204, OR § 7–105
OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE OR § 5–133, § 5–134, § 5–138, § 5–142, § 5–203, OR
§ 5–703 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE; OR
2. Arising out of the same incident as an act listed in item 1
of this item;
(2) A child who is in need of supervision;
(3) A child who has received a citation for a violation;
(4) Except as provided in subsection (d)(6) of this section, a peace order
proceeding in which the respondent is a child; and
(5) Proceedings arising under the Interstate Compact on Juveniles.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.